California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(2) Include a statement in substantially the following form: “You are required to serve and deposit with the clerk of court a list of expert witnesses and statements of valuation data in compliance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 1258.210) of Chapter 7 of Title 7 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure not later than the date of exchange to be set in accordance with that article. Except as otherwise provided in that article, your failure to do so will constitute a waiver of your right to call unlisted expert witnesses during your case in chief and of your right to introduce on direct examination during your case in chief any matter that is required to be, but is not, set forth in your statements of valuation data.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1258.220.

(a) For the purposes of this article, the “date of exchange” is the date agreed to for the exchange of their lists of expert witnesses and statements of valuation data by the party who served a demand and the party on whom the demand was served or, failing agreement, a date 90 days prior to commencement of the trial on the issue of compensation or the date set by the court on noticed motion of either party establishing good cause therefor.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision
(a), unless otherwise agreed to by the parties, the date of exchange shall not be earlier than nine months after the date of commencement of the proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 428, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1258.230.

(a) Not later than the date of exchange:

(1) Each party who served a demand and each party upon whom a demand was served shall deposit with the clerk of the court a list of expert witnesses and statements of valuation data.

(2) A party who served a demand shall serve his list and statements upon each party on whom he served his demand.

(3) Each party on whom a demand was served shall serve his list and statements upon the party who served the demand.

(b) The clerk of the court shall make an entry in the register of actions for each list of expert witnesses and statement of valuation data deposited with him pursuant to this article. The lists and statements shall not be filed in the proceeding, but the clerk shall make them available to the court at the commencement of the trial for the limited purpose of enabling the court to apply the provisions of this article. Unless the court otherwise orders, the clerk shall, at the conclusion of the trial, return all lists and statements to the attorneys for the parties who deposited them. Lists or statements ordered by the court to be retained may thereafter be destroyed or otherwise disposed of in accordance with the provisions of law governing the destruction or disposition of exhibits introduced in the trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1258.240.

The list of expert witnesses shall include the name, business or residence address, and business, occupation, or profession of each person intended to be called as an expert witness by the party and a statement of the subject matter to which his testimony relates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1258.250.

A statement of valuation data shall be exchanged for each person the party intends to call as a witness to testify to his opinion as to any of the following matters:

(a) The value of the property being taken.

(b) The amount of the damage, if any, to the remainder of the larger parcel from which such property is taken.

(c) The amount of the benefit, if any, to the remainder of the larger parcel from which such property is taken.

(d) The amount of any other compensation required to be paid by Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 1263.010) or Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1265.010).

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1258.260.

(a) The statement of valuation data shall give the name and business or residence address of the witness and shall include a statement whether the witness will testify to an opinion as to any of the matters listed in Section 1258.250 and, as to each matter upon which the witness will give an opinion, what that opinion is and the following items to the extent that the opinion is based on them:

(1) The interest being valued.

(2) The date of valuation used by the witness.

(3) The highest and best use of the property.

(4) The applicable zoning and the opinion of the witness as to the probability of any change in zoning.

(5) The sales, contracts to sell and purchase, and leases supporting the opinion.

(6) The cost of reproduction or replacement of the existing improvements on the property, the depreciation or obsolescence the improvements have suffered, and the method of calculation used to determine depreciation.

(7) The gross income from the property, the deductions from gross income, and the resulting net income; the reasonable net rental value
attributable to the land and existing improvements, and the estimated gross rental income and deductions upon which the reasonable net rental value is computed; the rate of capitalization used; and the value indicated by the capitalization.

(8) If the property is a portion of a larger parcel, a description of the larger parcel and its value.

(9) If the opinion concerns loss of goodwill, the method used to determine the loss, and a summary of the data supporting the opinion.

(b) With respect to each sale, contract, or lease listed under paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), the statement of valuation data shall give:

(1) The names and business or residence addresses, if known, of the parties to the transaction.

(2) The location of the property subject to the transaction.

(3) The date of the transaction.

(4) If recorded, the date of recording and the volume and page or other identification of the record of the transaction.

(5) The price and other terms and circumstances of the transaction. In lieu of stating the terms contained in any contract, lease, or other document, the statement may, if the document is available for inspection by the adverse party, state the place where and the times when it is available for inspection.

(6) The total area and shape of the property subject to the transaction.

(c) If any opinion referred to in Section
1258.250 is based in whole or in substantial part upon the opinion of another person, the statement of valuation data shall include the name and business or residence address of that other person, his business, occupation, or profession, and a statement as to the subject matter to which his or her opinion relates.

(d) Except when an appraisal report is used as a statement of valuation data as permitted by subdivision (e), the statement of valuation data shall include a statement, signed by the witness, that the witness has read the statement of valuation data and that it fairly and correctly states his or her opinions and knowledge as to the matters therein stated.

(e) An appraisal report that has been prepared by the witness which includes the information required to be included in a statement of valuation data may be used as a statement of valuation data under this
article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 428, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1258.270.

(a) A party who is required to exchange lists of expert witnesses and statements of valuation data shall diligently give notice to the parties upon whom his list and statements were served if, after service of his list and statements, he:

(1) Determines to call an expert witness not included in his list of expert witnesses to testify on direct examination during his case in chief;

(2) Determines to have a witness called by him testify on direct examination during his case in chief to any opinion or data required to be
listed in the statement of valuation data for that witness but which was not so listed; or

(3) Discovers any data required to be listed in a statement of valuation data but which was not so listed.

(b) The notice required by subdivision (a) shall include the information specified in Sections 1258.240 and 1258.260 and shall be in writing; but such notice is not required to be in writing if it is given after the commencement of the trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1258.280.

Except as provided in Section 1258.290, upon objection of a party who has served his list of expert witnesses and statements of valuation data in compliance with Section 1258.230:

(a) No party required to serve a list of expert witnesses on the objecting party may call an expert witness to testify on direct examination during his case in chief unless the information required by Section 1258.240 for such witness is included in the list served.

(b) No party required to serve statements of valuation data on the objecting party may call a
witness to testify on direct examination during his case in chief to his opinion on any matter listed in Section 1258.250 unless a statement of valuation data for such witness was served.

(c) No witness called by a party required to serve statements of valuation data on the objecting party may testify on direct examination during the case in chief of the party who called him to any opinion or data required to be listed in the statement of valuation data for such witness unless such opinion or data is listed in the statement served except that testimony that is merely an explanation or elaboration of data so listed is not inadmissible under this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1258.290.

(a) The court may, upon such terms as may be just (including but not limited to continuing the trial for a reasonable period of time and awarding costs and litigation expenses), permit a party to call a witness, or permit a witness called by a party to testify to an opinion or data on direct examination, during the party’s case in chief where such witness, opinion, or data is required to be, but is not, included in such party’s list of expert witnesses or statements of valuation data if the court finds that such party has made a good faith effort to comply with Sections 1258.210 to 1258.260, inclusive, that he has complied with Section 1258.270,
and that by the date of exchange he:

(1) Would not in the exercise of reasonable diligence have determined to call such witness or discovered or listed such opinion or data; or

(2) Failed to determine to call such witness or to discover or list such opinion or data through mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect.

(b) In making a determination under this section, the court shall take into account the extent to which the opposing party has relied upon the list of expert witnesses and statements of valuation data and will be prejudiced if the witness is called or the testimony concerning such opinion or data is given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1258.300.

The superior court in any county may provide by court rule a procedure for the exchange of valuation data which shall be used in lieu of the procedure provided by this article if the Judicial Council finds that such procedure serves the same purpose and is an adequate substitute for the procedure provided by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Procedures for Determining Right to Take and Compensation [1260.010. - 1260.250.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1260.010. - 1260.040.]

1260.010.

Proceedings under this title take precedence over all other civil actions in the matter of setting the same for hearing or trial in order that such proceedings shall be quickly heard and determined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1260.020.

(a) If proceedings to acquire the same property are consolidated, the court shall first determine whether the public uses for which the property is sought are compatible within the meaning of Article 6 (commencing with Section 1240.510) of Chapter 3. If the court determines that the uses are compatible, it shall permit the proceeding to continue with the plaintiffs acting jointly. The court shall apportion the obligation to pay any award in the proceeding in proportion to the use, damage, and benefits attributable to each plaintiff.

(b) If the court determines pursuant to subdivision
(a) that the uses are not all compatible, it shall further determine which of the uses is the more necessary public use within the meaning of Article 7 (commencing with Section 1240.610) of Chapter 3. The court shall permit the plaintiff alleging the more necessary public use, along with any other plaintiffs alleging compatible public uses under subdivision (a), to continue the proceeding. The court shall dismiss the proceeding as to the other plaintiffs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1260.030.

(a) If there is a dispute between plaintiff and defendant whether particular property is an improvement pertaining to the realty, either party may, not later than 30 days prior to the date specified in an order for possession of the property, move the court for a determination whether the property is an improvement pertaining to the realty.

(b) A motion under this section shall be heard not sooner than 10 days and not later than 20 days after service of notice of the motion. At the hearing, the court may consider any relevant evidence, including a view of the premises and property,
in making its determinations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1260.040.

(a) If there is a dispute between plaintiff and defendant over an evidentiary or other legal issue affecting the determination of compensation, either party may move the court for a ruling on the issue. The motion shall be made not later than 60 days before commencement of trial on the issue of compensation. The motion shall be heard by the judge assigned for trial of the case.

(b) Notwithstanding any other statute or rule of court governing the date of final offers and
demands of the parties and the date of trial of an eminent domain proceeding, the court may postpone those dates for a period sufficient to enable the parties to engage in further proceedings before trial in response to its ruling on the motion.

(c) This section supplements, and does not replace any other pretrial or trial procedure otherwise available to resolve an evidentiary or other legal issue affecting the determination of compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 428, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contesting Right to Take [1260.110. - 1260.120.]

1260.110.

(a) Where objections to the right to take are raised, unless the court orders otherwise, they shall be heard and determined prior to the determination of the issue of compensation.

(b) The court may, on motion of any party, after notice and hearing, specially set such objections for trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1260.120.

(a) The court shall hear and determine all objections to the right to take.

(b) If the court determines that the plaintiff has the right to acquire by eminent domain the property described in the complaint, the court shall so order. 

(c) If the court determines that the plaintiff does not have the right to acquire by eminent domain any property described in the complaint, it shall order either of the following:

(1) Immediate dismissal of the proceeding as
to that property.

(2) Conditional dismissal of the proceeding as to that property unless such corrective and remedial action as the court may prescribe has been taken within the period prescribed by the court in the order. An order made under this paragraph may impose such limitations and conditions as the court determines to be just under the circumstances of the particular case including the requirement that the plaintiff pay to the defendant all or part of the reasonable litigation expenses necessarily incurred by the defendant because of the plaintiff’s failure or omission which constituted the basis of the objection to the right to take.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Procedures Relating to Determination of Compensation [1260.210. - 1260.250.]

1260.210.

(a) The defendant shall present his evidence on the issue of compensation first and shall commence and conclude the argument.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by statute, neither the plaintiff nor the defendant has the burden of proof on the issue of compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1260.220.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), where there are divided interests in property acquired by eminent domain, the value of each interest and the injury, if any, to the remainder of such interest shall be separately assessed and compensation awarded therefor.

(b) The plaintiff may require that the amount of compensation be first determined as between plaintiff and all defendants claiming an interest in the property. Thereafter, in the same proceeding, the trier of fact shall determine the respective rights of the defendants in and to the amount of compensation awarded and
shall apportion the award accordingly. Nothing in this subdivision limits the right of a defendant to present during the first stage of the proceeding evidence of the value of, or injury to, the property or the defendant’s interest in the property; and the right of a defendant to present evidence during the second stage of the proceeding is not affected by the failure to exercise the right to present evidence during the first stage of the proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 294.)
-------------------------------------------

1260.230.

As far as practicable, the trier of fact shall assess separately each of the following:

(a) Compensation for the property taken as required by Article 4 (commencing with Section 1263.310) of Chapter 9.

(b) When the property acquired is part of a larger parcel:

(1) The amount of the damage, if any, to the remainder as required by Article 5 (commencing with Section 1263.410) of Chapter 9.

(2) The amount of the benefit, if any, to the remainder as required by Article 5 (commencing with Section 1263.410) of Chapter 9.

(c) Compensation for loss of goodwill, if any, as required by Article 6 (commencing with Section 1263.510) of Chapter 9.

(d) Compensation claimed under subdivision (c) of Section 1250.320.

(e) Compensation claimed under subdivision (d) of Section 1250.320.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 401, Sec. 6.   (AB 1578)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1260.240.

Where any persons unknown or any deceased persons or the heirs and devisees of any deceased persons have been properly joined as defendants but have not appeared either personally or by a personal representative, the court shall determine the extent of the interests of such defendants in the property taken or in the remainder if the property taken is part of a larger parcel and the compensation to be awarded for such interests. The court may determine the extent and value of the interests of all such defendants in the aggregate without apportionment between the respective defendants. In any event, in the case of deceased persons, the court shall determine only the
extent and value of the interest of the decedent and shall not determine the extent and value of the separate interests of the heirs and devisees in such decedent’s interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1260.250.

(a) In a county where both the auditor and the tax collector are elected officials, the court shall by order give the auditor or tax collector the legal description of the property sought to be taken and direct the auditor or tax collector to certify to the court the information required by subdivision (c), and the auditor or tax collector shall promptly certify the required information to the court. In all other counties, the court shall by order give the tax collector the legal description of the property sought to be taken and
direct the tax collector to certify to the court the information required by subdivision (c), and the tax collector shall promptly certify the required information to the court.

(b) The court order shall be made on or before the earliest of the following dates:

(1) The date the court makes an order for possession.

(2) The date set for trial.

(3) The date of entry of judgment.

(c) The court order shall require certification of the following information:

(1) The current assessed value of the property together with its assessed identification number.

(2) All unpaid
taxes on the property, and any penalties and costs that have accrued thereon while on the secured roll, levied for prior tax years that constitute a lien on the property.

(3) All unpaid taxes on the property, and any penalties and costs that have accrued thereon while on the secured roll, levied for the current tax year that constitute a lien on the property prorated to, but not including, the date of apportionment determined pursuant to Section 5082 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or the date of trial, whichever is earlier. If the amount of the current taxes is not ascertainable at the time of proration, the amount shall be estimated and computed based on the assessed value for the current assessment year and the tax rate levied on the property for the immediately prior tax year.

(4) The actual or estimated amount of taxes on the property that are or will become a lien on the
property in the next succeeding tax year prorated to, but not including, the date of apportionment determined pursuant to Section 5082 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or the date of trial, whichever is earlier. Any estimated amount of taxes shall be computed based on the assessed value of the property for the current assessment year and the tax rate levied on the property for the current tax year.

(5) The amount of the taxes, penalties, and costs allocable to one day of the current tax year, and where applicable, the amount allocable to one day of the next succeeding tax year, hereinafter referred to as the “daily prorate.”

(6) The total of paragraphs (2), (3), and (4).

(d) If the property sought to be taken does not have a separate valuation on the assessment roll, the information required by this section shall be
for the larger parcel of which the property is a part.

(e) The court, as part of the judgment, shall separately state the amount certified pursuant to this section and order that the amount be paid to the tax collector from the award. If the amount so certified is prorated to the date of trial, the order shall include, in addition to the amount so certified, an amount equal to the applicable daily prorate multiplied by the number of days commencing on the date of trial and ending on and including the day before the date of apportionment determined pursuant to Section 5082 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if the board of supervisors provides the procedure set forth in Section 5087 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the court shall make no award of taxes in the judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 892, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Compensation [1263.010. - 1263.770.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1263.010. - 1263.025.]

1263.010.

(a) The owner of property acquired by eminent domain is entitled to compensation as provided in this chapter.

(b) Nothing in this chapter affects any rights the owner of property acquired by eminent domain may have under any other statute. In any case where two or more statutes provide compensation for the same loss, the person entitled to compensation may be paid only once for that loss.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.015.

At the request of an owner of property acquired by eminent domain, the public entity may enter into an agreement with the owner specifying the manner of payment of compensation to which the owner is entitled as the result of the acquisition. The agreement may provide that the compensation shall be paid by the public entity to the owner over a period not to exceed 10 years from the date the owner’s right to compensation accrues. The agreement may also provide for the payment of interest by the public entity; however, the rate of interest agreed upon may not exceed the maximum rate authorized by Section 16731 or 53531 of the Government Code, as
applicable, in connection with the issuance of bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1368, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.020.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the right to compensation shall be deemed to have accrued at the date of filing the complaint.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.025.

(a) A public entity shall offer to pay the reasonable costs, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), of an independent appraisal ordered by the owner of a property that the public entity offers to purchase under a threat of eminent domain, at the time the public entity makes the offer to purchase the property. The independent appraisal shall be conducted by an appraiser licensed by the Office of Real Estate Appraisers.

(b) For purposes of this section, an offer to
purchase a property “under a threat of eminent domain” is an offer to purchase a property pursuant to any of the following:

(1) Eminent domain.

(2) Following adoption of a resolution of necessity for the property pursuant to Section 1240.040.

(3) Following a statement that the public entity may take the property by eminent domain.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 594, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Date of Valuation [1263.110. - 1263.150.]

1263.110.

(a) Unless an earlier date of valuation is applicable under this article, if the plaintiff deposits the probable compensation in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 1255.010) of Chapter 6 or the amount of the award in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 1268.110) of Chapter 11, the date of valuation is the date on which the deposit is made.

(b) Whether or not the plaintiff has taken possession of the property or obtained an order for possession, if the court determines pursuant to Section 1255.030 that the probable amount of compensation exceeds the
amount previously deposited pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 1255.010) of Chapter 6 and the amount on deposit is not increased accordingly within the time allowed under Section 1255.030, no deposit shall be deemed to have been made for the purpose of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.120.

If the issue of compensation is brought to trial within one year after commencement of the proceeding, the date of valuation is the date of commencement of the proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.130.

Subject to Section 1263.110, if the issue of compensation is not brought to trial within one year after commencement of the proceeding, the date of valuation is the date of the commencement of the trial unless the delay is caused by the defendant, in which case the date of valuation is the date of commencement of the proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.140.

Subject to Section 1263.110, if a new trial is ordered by the trial or appellate court and the new trial is not commenced within one year after the commencement of the proceeding, the date of valuation is the date of the commencement of such new trial unless, in the interest of justice, the court ordering the new trial orders a different date of valuation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.150.

Subject to Section 1263.110, if a mistrial is declared and the retrial is not commenced within one year after the commencement of the proceeding, the date of valuation is the date of the commencement of the retrial of the case unless, in the interest of justice, the court declaring the mistrial orders a different date of valuation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Compensation for Improvements [1263.205. - 1263.270.]

1263.205.

(a) As used in this article, “improvements pertaining to the realty” include any machinery or equipment installed for use on property taken by eminent domain, or on the remainder if such property is part of a larger parcel, that cannot be removed without a substantial economic loss or without substantial damage to the property on which it is installed, regardless of the method of installation.

(b) In determining whether particular property can be removed “without a substantial economic loss” within the meaning of this section, the value of the property in place considered as a part
of the realty should be compared with its value if it were removed and sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.210.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by statute, all improvements pertaining to the realty shall be taken into account in determining compensation.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies notwithstanding the right or obligation of a tenant, as against the owner of any other interest in real property, to remove such improvement at the expiration of his term.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.230.

(a) Improvements pertaining to the realty shall not be taken into account in determining compensation to the extent that they are removed or destroyed before the earliest of the following times:

(1) The time the plaintiff takes title to the property.

(2) The time the plaintiff takes possession of the property.

(3) If the defendant moves from the property in compliance with an order for possession, the date specified in the order; except that, if the
defendant so moves prior to such date and gives the plaintiff written notice thereof, the date 24 hours after such notice is received by the plaintiff.

(b) Where improvements pertaining to the realty are removed or destroyed by the defendant at any time, such improvements shall not be taken into account in determining compensation. Where such removal or destruction damages the remaining property, such damage shall be taken into account in determining compensation to the extent it reduces the value of the remaining property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.240.

Improvements pertaining to the realty made subsequent to the date of service of summons shall not be taken into account in determining compensation unless one of the following is established:

(a) The improvement is one required to be made by a public utility to its utility system.

(b) The improvement is one made with the written consent of the plaintiff.

(c) The improvement is one authorized to be made by a court order issued after a noticed hearing and upon a finding by the
court that the hardship to the defendant of not permitting the improvement outweighs the hardship to the plaintiff of permitting the improvement. The court may, at the time it makes an order under this subdivision authorizing the improvement to be made, limit the extent to which the improvement shall be taken into account in determining compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.250.

(a) The acquisition of property by eminent domain shall not prevent the defendant from harvesting and marketing crops planted before or after the service of summons. If the plaintiff takes possession of the property at a time that prevents the defendant from harvesting and marketing the crops, the fair market value of the crops in place at the date the plaintiff is authorized to take possession of the property shall be included in the compensation awarded for the property taken.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the plaintiff may obtain a court order precluding the defendant from
planting crops after service of summons, in which case the compensation awarded for the property taken shall include an amount sufficient to compensate for loss caused by the limitation on the defendant’s right to use the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.260.

Notwithstanding Section 1263.210, the owner of improvements pertaining to the realty may elect to remove any or all such improvements by serving on the plaintiff within 60 days after service of summons written notice of such election. If the plaintiff fails within 30 days thereafter to serve on the owner written notice of refusal to allow removal of such improvements, the owner may remove such improvements and shall be compensated for their reasonable removal and relocation cost not to exceed the market value of the improvements. Where such removal will cause damage to the structure in which the improvements are located, the defendant shall cause no more damage to the
structure than is reasonably necessary in removing the improvements, and the structure shall be valued as if the removal had caused no damage to the structure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.270.

Where an improvement pertaining to the realty is located in part upon property taken and in part upon property not taken, the court may, on motion of any party and a determination that justice so requires, direct the plaintiff to acquire the entire improvement, including the part located on property not taken, together with an easement or other interest reasonably necessary for the demolition, removal, or relocation of the improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Measure of Compensation for Property Taken [1263.310. - 1263.330.]

1263.310.

Compensation shall be awarded for the property taken. The measure of this compensation is the fair market value of the property taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.320.

(a) The fair market value of the property taken is the highest price on the date of valuation that would be agreed to by a seller, being willing to sell but under no particular or urgent necessity for so doing, nor obliged to sell, and a buyer, being ready, willing, and able to buy but under no particular necessity for so doing, each dealing with the other with full knowledge of all the uses and purposes for which the property is reasonably adaptable and available.

(b) The fair market value of property taken for which there is no relevant, comparable market is its value on the date of valuation as determined by any method of valuation that is just and equitable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 7, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.321.

A just and equitable method of determining the value of nonprofit, special use property for which there is no relevant, comparable market is as set forth in Section 824 of the Evidence Code, but subject to the exceptions set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 824 of the Evidence Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 7, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.330.

The fair market value of the property taken shall not include any increase or decrease in the value of the property that is attributable to any of the following:

(a) The project for which the property is taken.

(b) The eminent domain proceeding in which the property is taken.

(c) Any preliminary actions of the plaintiff relating to the taking of the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Compensation for Injury to Remainder [1263.410. - 1263.450.]

1263.410.

(a) Where the property acquired is part of a larger parcel, in addition to the compensation awarded pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 1263.310) for the part taken, compensation shall be awarded for the injury, if any, to the remainder.

(b) Compensation for injury to the remainder is the amount of the damage to the remainder reduced by the amount of the benefit to the remainder. If the amount of the benefit to the remainder equals or exceeds the amount of the damage to the remainder, no compensation shall be awarded under this article. If the amount of the benefit to the
remainder exceeds the amount of damage to the remainder, such excess shall be deducted from the compensation provided in Section 1263.510, if any, but shall not be deducted from the compensation required to be awarded for the property taken or from the other compensation required by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.420.

Damage to the remainder is the damage, if any, caused to the remainder by either or both of the following:

(a) The severance of the remainder from the part taken.

(b) The construction and use of the project for which the property is taken in the manner proposed by the plaintiff whether or not the damage is caused by a portion of the project located on the part taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.430.

Benefit to the remainder is the benefit, if any, caused by the construction and use of the project for which the property is taken in the manner proposed by the plaintiff whether or not the benefit is caused by a portion of the project located on the part taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.440.

(a) The amount of any damage to the remainder and any benefit to the remainder shall reflect any delay in the time when the damage or benefit caused by the construction and use of the project in the manner proposed by the plaintiff will actually be realized.

(b) The value of the remainder on the date of valuation, excluding prior changes in value as prescribed in Section 1263.330, shall serve as the base from which the amount of any damage and the amount of any benefit to the remainder shall be determined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.450.

Compensation for injury to the remainder shall be based on the project as proposed. Any features of the project which mitigate the damage or provide benefit to the remainder, including but not limited to easements, crossings, underpasses, access roads, fencing, drainage facilities, and cattle guards, shall be taken into account in determining the compensation for injury to the remainder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------


